West Virginia, session 2025, HB2654.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 40.   Food Safety Act of 2025. §19-40-1. Prohibited substances in food products; penalties. (a) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, distribute, hold, or offer for sale, in commerce a food product for human consumption that contains any of the following substances:(1) Potassium bromate; and(2) Propylparaben.(b) (1) Upon an action brought by the Attorney General, a municipal attorney, or a prosecuting attorney, a person or entity that violates subsection (a) of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for a first violation, and not to exceed $10,000 for each subsequent violation.(2) This section does not impair or impede any other rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under any other law. The remedies provided in this section are cumulative with any other remedies available under any other law.